Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-908
Department of Correctional Services; estimate of appropriations; prepare.

The Department of Correctional Services shall prepare an estimate of the appropriations necessary for the support and needed improvements of the institutions under its charge, and a report of their operation during the preceding year, for the use of the Legislature. The estimate shall be printed, and may include a report of the results of investigation of methods of institution management and of treatment of patients and inmates, with suggestions for the betterment of any or all conditions.

Laws 1973, LB 563, § 60.